District of Columbia statutes.
38-909

Insurance for arms issued to high school cadets.

Arms authorized to be issued by the Department of the Army to high school cadets of the District of Columbia shall hereafter be issued without requiring that the same shall be insured from loss by fire.

April 27, 1904, 33 Stat. 379, ch. 1628
1981 Ed., § 31-2209.
1973 Ed., § 31-1116.